Maine, session 132, LD1983.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. 7 MRSA §2231, sub-§1-A, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 528, §1 and
amended by PL 2021, c. 669, §5, is further amended to read:
D. "Hemp" means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including
the seeds and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts and salts of
isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta‑9‑tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of
not more than 0.3% on a dry weight basis, or as otherwise defined in federal law.
"Hemp" includes agricultural commodities and products derived from hemp and
topical or ingestible consumer products, including food, food additives and food
products derived from hemp, which in their final forms contain a delta-9-
tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than 0.3% or as otherwise defined in
federal law. "Hemp" also includes a hemp product for consumer use. "Hemp" does
not include intoxicating hemp-derived products, cannabis for medical use pursuant to
Title 22, chapter 558‑C or adult use cannabis pursuant to Title 28‑B, chapter 1.
Sec. A-2. 7 MRSA §2231, sub-§1-A, ¶D-1 is enacted to read:
D-1. "Hemp product" means a product, including any raw material from hemp that is
used for or added to a food or beverage, that:
(1) Contains hemp and has completed all stages of processing needed for the
product; and
(2) When offered for retail sale:
(a) Contains a total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of no greater than
0.3%; and
(b) Contains either no more than 2 milligrams of total tetrahydrocannabinol
per package or an amount of cannabidiol that is no less than 25 times greater
than the amount of total tetrahydrocannabinol per package.
Sec. A-3. 7 MRSA §2231, sub-§1-A, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. "Intoxicating hemp-derived product" means a product, including any raw material
from hemp that is used for or added to a food, beverage, topical or inhalable product
that:
(1) Contains hemp and has completed all stages of processing needed for the
product; and
(2) Contains either more than 2 milligrams of total tetrahydrocannabinol per
package or an amount of cannabidiol that is less than 25 times greater than the
amount of total tetrahydrocannabinol per package.
An "intoxicating hemp-derived product" is adult use cannabis as defined in Title 28-B,
section 102-A, subsection 1 if it is a raw material from hemp and is an adult use
cannabis product as defined in Title 28-B, section 102-A, subsection 2 if it used for or
added to a food, beverage, topical or inhalable product.
Sec. A-4. 7 MRSA §2231, sub-§1-A, ¶G is enacted to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2543(01)

G. "Total tetrahydrocannabinol" means all of the tetrahydrocannabinol in a product,
including delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol and delta-10-
tetrahydrocannabinol; delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, delta-9-
tetrahydrocannabinolic acid and delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinolic acid; and other
tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinolic acid isomers.
Sec. A-5. 7 MRSA §2231, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 528, §1 and amended
by PL 2021, c. 669, §5, is further amended to read:
10. Hemp and hemp products not tracked as cannabis. Notwithstanding any
provision of Title 22, chapter 558‑C or Title 28‑B, chapter 1 to the contrary, hemp and
products derived from hemp Hemp and hemp products may not be tracked as part of the
medical use of cannabis program under Title 22, chapter 558‑C or the regulation of adult
use cannabis under Title 28‑B, chapter 1. Intoxicating hemp-derived products must be
transferred to an adult use cannabis products manufacturing facility licensed in accordance
with Title 28-B, chapter 1 and must be tracked as adult use cannabis or adult use cannabis
products, as applicable, upon transfer to the adult use cannabis program.
Sec. A-6. 7 MRSA §2231, sub-§10-A is enacted to read:
10-A. Intoxicating hemp-derived products regulated as adult use cannabis. Any
intoxicating hemp-derived product offered for sale to consumers in the State is subject to
the requirements applicable to adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products in
accordance with Title 28-B, chapter 1 and the rules adopted pursuant to that chapter,
including, but not limited to, requirements applicable to tracking, testing, manufacture,
packaging, labeling, transportation or sale of intoxicating hemp-derived products.
Intoxicating hemp-derived products sold to consumers are subject to the sales tax on adult
use cannabis and adult use cannabis products pursuant to Title 36, section 1811.
PART B
Sec. B-1. 28-A MRSA §2, sub-§12-E is enacted to read:
12-E. Intoxicating hemp-derived product. "Intoxicating hemp-derived product" has
the same meaning as in Title 7, section 2231, subsection 1-A, paragraph F.
Sec. B-2. 28-A MRSA §83-B, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Prevent sale of intoxicating hemp-derived products. Prevent the sale of
intoxicating hemp-derived products by licensees, except as authorized in Title 28-B,
chapter 1, through the seizure and destruction of such products offered for sale to
consumers by a licensee;
Sec. B-3. 28-A MRSA §601, sub-§2, ¶I, as amended by PL 1997, c. 373, §51, is
further amended to read:
I. The bureau determines that the purpose of the application is to circumvent the
provisions of this section; or
Sec. B-4. 28-A MRSA §601, sub-§2, ¶J, as amended by PL 2021, c. 658, §84, is
further amended to read:
J. The applicant is a golf course or a restaurant located on the property of a golf course
and the Maine Human Rights Commission has found reasonable grounds to believe
that the golf course has denied membership to a person in violation of Title 5, chapter
Page 2 - 132LR2543(01)

413 337, subchapter 5 and has determined that conciliation efforts under Title 5, section
424 4612, subsection 3 have not succeeded. The Maine Human Rights Commission shall
435 notify the bureau when the golf course has corrected its discriminatory membership
446 practices, after which the applicant ceases to be disqualified under this paragraph.; or
Sec. B-5. 28-A MRSA §601, sub-§2, ¶K is enacted to read:
K. The bureau determines that the applicant has sold, furnished or given away, or
offered to sell, furnish or give away, an intoxicating hemp-derived product in violation
of section 2090.
Sec. B-6. 28-A MRSA §709, sub-§1, ¶C is enacted to read:
C. A licensee, employee of a licensee or agent of a licensee may not sell, furnish or
give away, or offer to sell, furnish or give away, an intoxicating hemp-derived product,
except as authorized by Title 28-B, chapter 1.
Sec. B-7. 28-A MRSA §2090 is enacted to read:
§2090. Selling, furnishing or giving away intoxicating hemp-derived products
1. Prohibition. A person may not sell, furnish or give away, or offer to sell, furnish
or give away, an intoxicating hemp-derived product, except as authorized by Title 28-B,
chapter 1.
2. Penalty. The following penalties apply to violations of this section.
A. A person that violates subsection 1 commits a civil violation for which a fine of not
less than $500 and not more than $1,000 must be adjudged.
B. A person that violates subsection 1 after having been previously adjudicated as
violating subsection 1 commits a civil violation for which a fine of not less than $500
and not more than $3,000 must be adjudged.
PART C
Sec. C-1. 28-B MRSA §102-A, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §3,
is amended to read:
1. Adult use cannabis. "Adult use cannabis" means cannabis cultivated,
manufactured, distributed or sold by a cannabis establishment. "Adult use cannabis"
includes an intoxicating hemp-derived product that is a raw material from hemp as defined
in Title 7, section 2231, subsection 1-A, paragraph D.
Sec. C-2. 28-B MRSA §102-A, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §3,
is amended to read:
2. Adult use cannabis product. "Adult use cannabis product" means a cannabis
product that is manufactured, distributed or sold by a cannabis establishment. "Adult use
cannabis product" includes an intoxicating hemp-derived product that is used for or added
to a food, beverage, topical or inhalable product.
Sec. C-3. 28-B MRSA §102-A, sub-§8, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §3,
is amended to read:
8. Cannabis. "Cannabis" means the leaves, stems, flowers and seeds of a cannabis
plant, whether growing or not. "Cannabis" includes cannabis concentrate and an
Page 3 - 132LR2543(01)

411 intoxicating hemp-derived product but does not include hemp as defined in Title 7, section
422 2231, subsection 1‑A, paragraph D or a cannabis product.
Sec. C-4. 28-B MRSA §102-A, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §3,
is amended to read:
9. Cannabis concentrate. "Cannabis concentrate" means the resin extracted from any
part of a cannabis plant and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or
preparation from such resin, including, but not limited to, hashish. "Cannabis concentrate"
does not include resin extracted from hemp as defined in Title 7, section 2231, subsection
1‑A, paragraph D, unless that resin is an intoxicating hemp-derived product. In determining
the weight of cannabis concentrate in a cannabis product, the weight of any other ingredient
combined with cannabis or cannabis concentrate to prepare the cannabis product may not
be included.
Sec. C-5. 28-B MRSA §102-A, sub-§15, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §3,
is amended to read:
15. Cannabis product. "Cannabis product" means a product composed of cannabis
or cannabis concentrate and other ingredients that is intended for use or consumption.
"Cannabis product" includes, but is not limited to, an edible cannabis product, a cannabis
ointment and, a cannabis tincture and, as applicable, an intoxicating hemp-derived product.
"Cannabis product" does not include cannabis concentrate or a product containing hemp as
defined in Title 7, section 2231, subsection 1‑A, paragraph D.
Sec. C-6. 28-B MRSA §102-A, sub-§33-A is enacted to read:
33-A. Intoxicating hemp-derived product. "Intoxicating hemp-derived product" has
the same meaning as in Title 7, section 2231, subsection 1-A, paragraph F.
Sec. C-7. 28-B MRSA §103, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 6, §13, is
further amended to read:
B. Sell or offer for sale cannabis or cannabis products, including intoxicating hemp-
derived products;
Sec. C-8. 28-B MRSA §103, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Enforcement and penalties for unauthorized distribution or sale of intoxicating
hemp-derived products. Notwithstanding the authority of any other state or local entity
to regulate the distribution or sale of intoxicating hemp-derived products, the office may
enter any retail establishment, restaurant or bar where such products are offered for
distribution or sale to consumers, whether or not that retail establishment, restaurant or bar
has a license to operate a cannabis store in accordance with this chapter. The office may
direct any retail establishment, restaurant or bar that is not a cannabis store licensed
pursuant to this chapter to remove and destroy any intoxicating hemp-derived products
offered for sale to consumers.
Sec. C-9. 28-B MRSA §105, first ¶, as amended by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §8, is
further amended to read:
The office shall implement and administer a system, referred to in this section as "the
tracking system," for the tracking of cannabis plants, adult use cannabis and adult use
cannabis products from immature cannabis plant to the point of retail sale, return, disposal
Page 4 - 132LR2543(01)

413 or destruction. Cannabis, cannabis concentrate or cannabis products that are intoxicating
424 hemp-derived products must be tracked using the tracking system from the point the
435 intoxicating hemp-derived product is transferred from outside the adult use cannabis
446 program to a products manufacturing facility to the point of retail sale, return, disposal or
457 destruction. The tracking system must allow for cannabis plants at the stage of cultivation
468 and upon transfer from the stage of cultivation to another licensee to be tracked by group.
479 The office may implement a tracking system that allows adult use cannabis or adult use
580 cannabis products to be tracked by group.
Sec. C-10. 28-B MRSA §105, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 628, §1 and
amended by c. 669, §5, is further amended to read:
A. Record-keeping requirements for the tracking of cannabis plants when tracked
individually and when tracked by group; and
Sec. C-11. 28-B MRSA §105, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B,
§13, is further amended to read:
B. Record-keeping requirements necessary to ensure the office's ability to implement
a recall for reasons related to health and safety when tracking cannabis plants
individually or by group.; and
Sec. C-12. 28-B MRSA §105, sub-§2, ¶C is enacted to read:
C. Record-keeping requirements for tracking intoxicating hemp-derived products from
the point the product is transferred from outside the adult use cannabis program to a
products manufacturing facility to the point of retail sale, return, disposal or
destruction.
Sec. C-13. 28-B MRSA §502, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Acceptance of intoxicating hemp-derived products. All intoxicating hemp-
derived products offered for sale in the State must be transferred into the adult use cannabis
program to a products manufacturing facility. A products manufacturing facility that
accepts transfers of intoxicating hemp-derived products shall ensure that:
A. All intoxicating hemp-derived products are tracked in accordance with section 105;
B. All required information regarding the identity of the transferring party is recorded
upon receipt of the intoxicating hemp-derived products in accordance with section 511;
and
C. The intoxicating hemp-derived products are tested in accordance with subchapter 6
prior to being offered for retail sale to consumers.
Sec. C-14. 28-B MRSA §504, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 6, §16, is
further amended to read:
A. Adult use cannabis or adult use cannabis products, including intoxicating hemp-
derived products transferred by a products manufacturing facility to the cannabis store
pursuant to section 502, subsection 1-B;
Sec. C-15. 28-B MRSA §504, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2021, c. 667, §1
and c. 669, §5, is further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) A delivery service, except as provided by subsection 9; or
Page 5 - 132LR2543(01)

Sec. C-16. 28-B MRSA §504, sub-§2, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 409, Pt. A,
§6 and amended by PL 2021, c. 669, §5, is further amended to read:
D. Sell adult use cannabis or adult use cannabis products to a person who is visibly
intoxicated.; or
Sec. C-17. 28-B MRSA §504, sub-§2, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. Sell or give away intoxicating hemp-derived products that were not received from
a products manufacturing facility pursuant to section 502, subsection 1-B.
Sec. C-18. 28-B MRSA §511, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Records of intoxicating hemp-derived products transferred into adult use
cannabis program. A products manufacturing facility licensee that accepts a transfer of
an intoxicating hemp-derived product from outside the adult use cannabis program shall
keep a record of the information regarding the origin of the intoxicating hemp-derived
product. The record must be accessible by the office in accordance with subsection 1. The
information must include the following:
A. The name, address and telephone number of the person that transferred the
intoxicating hemp-derived product to the products manufacturing facility, including
the name and telephone number of a natural person who is responsible for transporting
the intoxicating hemp-derived product to the products manufacturing facility and the
name and telephone number of a natural person who would be considered a principal
of the transferor if that transferor were a licensee;
B. The form and quantity of the intoxicating hemp-derived product received;
C. Whether any portion of the shipment of intoxicating hemp-derived product was
rejected by the licensee and the reason for rejecting the intoxicating hemp-derived
product;
D. Information regarding any pesticides used in the cultivation of the hemp from which
the intoxicating hemp-derived product is derived;
E. Information regarding any treatment or remediation of the hemp from which the
intoxicating hemp-derived product is derived using ozone, radiation or carcinogenic
gases, including the kind of treatment or remediation taken; and
F. Information regarding any gases, solvents or chemicals used to extract cannabinoids
from the hemp from which the intoxicating hemp-derived product is derived.
Sec. C-19. 28-B MRSA §701, sub-§1, ¶H, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 409, Pt. A,
§6 and amended by PL 2021, c. 669, §5, is further amended to read:
H. Information on gases, solvents and chemicals used in cannabis extraction or used
to extract cannabinoids from hemp to create intoxicating hemp-derived products;
Sec. C-20. 28-B MRSA §802-A, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt.
B, §134, is amended by enacting a new subparagraph (1-A) to read:
(1-A) Intentionally or recklessly selling or giving away an intoxicating hemp-
derived product that has not been tracked and tested in accordance with this
chapter;
PART D
Page 6 - 132LR2543(01)

Sec. D-1. 36 MRSA c. 724 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 724
INTOXICATING HEMP-DERIVED PRODUCTS TAX
§4931. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Adult use cannabis establishment. "Adult use cannabis establishment" has the
same meaning as "cannabis establishment" in Title 28-B, section 102-A, subsection 10.
2. Business. "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity or enterprise engaged
in the selling or distributing of intoxicating hemp-derived products in this State, except an
adult use cannabis establishment.
3. Consumer. "Consumer" means an individual who purchases, receives or possesses
intoxicating hemp-derived products for personal consumption and not for resale.
4. Cost price. "Cost price" means:
A. In the case of a manufacturer, the price set for intoxicating hemp-derived products
or, if a price has not been set, the wholesale value of those products; or
B. In the case of a distributor or consumer, the price at which the distributor or
consumer purchases intoxicating hemp-derived products before the allowance of any
discount, trade allowance, rebate or other reduction.
5. Distributor. "Distributor" means:
A. A person, that is not an adult use cannabis establishment, engaged in the business
of producing or manufacturing intoxicating hemp-derived products in this State for sale
in this State;
B. A person, that is not an adult use cannabis establishment, engaged in the business
of selling intoxicating hemp-derived products in this State that brings, or causes to be
brought, into this State intoxicating hemp-derived products for sale to an adult use
cannabis establishment;
C. A person, that is not an adult use cannabis establishment, with a place of business
in this State engaged in the business of selling intoxicating hemp-derived products in
this State that brings, or causes to be brought, into this State intoxicating hemp-derived
products for sale to a consumer;
D. A person, that is not an adult use cannabis establishment, engaged in the business
of selling intoxicating hemp-derived products that ships or transports intoxicating
hemp-derived products to an adult use cannabis establishment for sale in this State; or
E. An adult use cannabis establishment that imports, receives or acquires intoxicating
hemp-derived products for sale within the State.
A distributor may be located within or without the State.
Page 7 - 132LR2543(01)

6. Intoxicating hemp-derived product. "Intoxicating hemp-derived product" has the
same meaning as in Title 7, section 2231, subsection 1-A, paragraph F.
7. Manufacturer. "Manufacturer" means a person, that is not an adult use cannabis
establishment, that manufactures and sells intoxicating hemp-derived products.
8. Place of business. "Place of business" means any place where intoxicating hemp-
derived products are sold or where intoxicating hemp-derived products are manufactured,
stored or kept for the purpose of sale or consumption, including any vessel, vehicle,
airplane or train.
9. Sale. "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, barter or gift in any manner or by any
means whatsoever, for a consideration.
§4932. Registration
1. Generally. A distributor shall register with the assessor and collect and remit taxes
in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. A registration issued pursuant to this
section is not a license within the meaning of that term in the Maine Administrative
Procedure Act.
2. Applications; forms. A registration application under this section must be made
on a form prescribed by the assessor and must state the name and address of the applicant,
the address of the applicant's business and such other information as the assessor may
require for the proper administration of this chapter.
3. Penalties. The following penalties apply to violations of this section.
A. A distributor that sells at wholesale, offers for sale at wholesale, possesses with
intent to sell at wholesale or sells to consumers any intoxicating hemp-derived products
without being registered with the assessor pursuant to this section commits a civil
violation for which a fine of not less than $250 and not more than $500 must be
adjudged.
B. A distributor that violates paragraph A after having been previously adjudicated as
violating paragraph A commits a civil violation for which a fine of not less than $500
and not more than $1,000 must be adjudged for each subsequent violation.
4. Suspension and revocation. A registration pursuant to this section is
nontransferable. The assessor may suspend or revoke the registration of any registered
distributor for failure to comply with any provision of this chapter. A person aggrieved by
a suspension or revocation may request reconsideration as provided in section 151.
5. Notification. A distributor that has its registration under this section suspended or
revoked shall, within 10 business days of the suspension or revocation, inform in writing
all its accounts in this State that it no longer holds a valid registration under this section.
The assessor may publish the name of a distributor that has had its registration suspended
or revoked.
§4933. Tax on intoxicating hemp-derived products
1. Intoxicating hemp-derived products. Beginning January 1, 2026, a tax is imposed
on all intoxicating hemp-derived products at the rate of 20% of the cost price.
2. Imposition. The tax is imposed at the time the distributor brings or causes to be
brought into this State intoxicating hemp-derived products that are for sale or for use or at
Page 8 - 132LR2543(01)

413 the time intoxicating hemp-derived products are manufactured or fabricated in this State
424 for sale in this State.
An intoxicating hemp-derived product may be taxed only once by the State in
accordance with this section.